src/morphology/affixes/particles.lexc
LEXICON PCLE_BACK_CLIT

%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}han	# ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}han{MB}kaan	# ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_kO:{MB}han{MB}ko	# ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_pA:{MB}han{MB}pa	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kaan	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kaan{MB}han	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kaan{MB}kin	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kaan{MB}ko	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kaan{MB}pa	# ;

%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kin	# ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kin{MB}han	# ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kin{MB}kaan	# ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kin{MB}ko	# ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kin{MB}pa	# ;

%+Foc%_kO:{MB}ko	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}ko{MB}han	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}ko{MB}kaan	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_kin:{MB}ko{MB}kin	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_pA:{MB}ko{MB}pa	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_s:{MB}ko{MB}s	# ;

%+Foc%_pA:{MB}pa	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}pa{MB}han	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}pa{MB}kaan	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kin:{MB}pa{MB}kin	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kO:{MB}pa{MB}ko	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_s:{MB}pa{MB}s	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KA

%+Foc%_kA:{MB}ka	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KA_S

%+Foc%_kA:{MB}ka	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}ka{MB}han	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kapa	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}ka{MB}pa{MB}han	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_s:{MB}ka{MB}pa{MB}s	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_s:{MB}ka{MB}s	# ;

%+Foc%_s:{MB}s	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KO

%+Foc%_kO:{MB}ko	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}ko{MB}han	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_s:{MB}ko{MB}s	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT

:	# ;
:	PCLE_BACK_CLIT ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_POSS

%+Px3:{MB}nsa	PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxPl1:{MB}mme	PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxPl2:{MB}nne	PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxSg1:{MB}ni	PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxSg2:{MB}si	PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN

%+Px3:{MB}an	PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL

:	PCLE_BACK_POSS ;
:	PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT

:	PCLE_BACK_POSS ;
:	PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN ;
:	PCLE_BACK_CLIT ;
:	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN

%+Px3:{MB}en	PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL

:	PCLE_BACK_POSS ;
:	PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT

:	PCLE_BACK_POSS ;
:	PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN ;
:	PCLE_BACK_CLIT ;
:	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_COMPOUND_INTERJ

#:-	INTERJECTION ;

#:	INTERJECTION ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_CLIT

%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}hän	# ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}hän{MB}kään	# ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_kO:{MB}hän{MB}kö	# ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_pA:{MB}hän{MB}pä	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kään	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kään{MB}hän	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kään{MB}kin	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kään{MB}kö	# ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kään{MB}pä	# ;

%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kin	# ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kin{MB}hän	# ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kin{MB}kään	# ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kin{MB}kö	# ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kin{MB}pä	# ;

%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kö	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kö{MB}hän	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kö{MB}kään	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kö{MB}kin	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kö{MB}pä	# ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_s:{MB}kö{MB}s	# ;

%+Foc%_pA:{MB}pä	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}pä{MB}hän	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}pä{MB}kään	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kin:{MB}pä{MB}kin	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kO:{MB}pä{MB}kö	# ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_s:{MB}pä{MB}s	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_KA_S

%+Foc%_kA:{MB}kä	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kä{MB}hän	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kä{MB}pä	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kä{MB}pä{MB}hän	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_s:{MB}kä{MB}pä{MB}s	# ;

%+Foc%_kA%+Foc%_s:{MB}kä{MB}s	# ;

%+Foc%_s:{MB}s	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT

:	# ;
:	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_POSS

%+Px3:{MB}nsä	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxPl1:{MB}mme	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxPl2:{MB}nne	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxSg1:{MB}ni	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxSg2:{MB}si	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN

%+Px3:{MB}en	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL

:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS ;
:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT

:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS ;
:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN ;
:	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT ;
:	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_POSS_OPT

:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS ;
:	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT ;
:	# ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN

%+Px3:{MB}än	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL

:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS ;
:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;


LEXICON PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT

:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS ;
:	PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
:	PCLE_FRONT_CLIT ;
:	# ;
